Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6603SS (2) 91 ms/md S.F. 2251 Section 1. Section 357E.11A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. A combined district shall have the same powers , 3 requirements, and limitations to issue bonds that cities have 4 under the laws of this state, including but not limited to 5 chapter 76 , section 384.4 , and sections 384.23 through 384.94 . 6 The bonds shall be made payable at the place and be of the form 7 as the board of trustees shall by resolution designate. In the 8 application of the laws to this section , the words used in the 9 laws referring to municipal corporations or to cities shall 10 be held to include combined districts organized under this 11 chapter ; the words âcouncilâ or âcity councilâ shall be held to 12 include the board of trustees of a combined district; the words 13 âmayorâ and âclerkâ shall be held to include the president and 14 clerk of a board of trustees; and like construction shall be 15 given to any other words in the laws where required to permit 16 the exercise of the powers by combined districts under this 17 section . 18 Sec. 2. Section 357E.11A, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 19 amended by striking the subsection. 20